Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 3 Organization of General Assembly

22-3-1.
Making of lists of persons elected.

The secretary of state shall receive and examine the certificates of election of senators and representatives to the general assembly returned to the secretary’s office by the board of elections, and shall make separate lists of the persons named in it as elected to the offices of senators and representatives, respectively. In case at nine o’clock in the morning (9:00 a.m.) on the first Tuesday of January in each odd-numbered year, there shall be no certificates received by the secretary of state of the election of senator, senators, representative, or representatives, or either of them, from any senatorial or representative district, the secretary of state shall also place on the lists, respectively, the name of the person then holding the office for which there is no certificate returned or received of the election of any other person to that office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 4; P.L. 1901, ch. 808, § 13; P.L. 1902, ch. 1046, § 1; P.L. 1905, ch. 1229, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 19; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 21; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 21; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-1

; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 24.

22-3-2.
Organization of senate — Secretary of the senate and reading clerk.

At the time specified in §

22-3-1

7, the senate shall be called to order by the senior member in continuous service present from Newport, and if there are two (2) or more members from Newport of equal seniority of service, then by that one of them that shall be senior in age, and if there is no member present from Newport, by the senior member of the senate in continuous service present, and, if there are two (2) or more members of equal seniority of service, then by that one of them who is senior in age. The roll of members as appears by the list of senators shall then be called by the clerk, and the list shall be corrected by the secretary of state as provided in §

22-3-1

. If nineteen (19) of the members whose names appear upon the lists are present, but not otherwise, the member calling the senate to order as provided above shall call for nominations for the office of president of the senate, and shall receive the ballots of the members whose names are on the list for that office, and after the ballots have been counted by him or her and by the clerks of the senate, he or she shall declare the result, and the balloting shall continue until some person receives a majority of all the ballots, and the person receiving that majority shall be the president of the senate for the ensuing term of two (2) years. The member so calling the senate to order shall not receive, entertain, or put to vote any motion or question whatever, or point of order, while acting as presiding officer, and any member violating any of the foregoing provisions of this section, or allowing any person whose name is not upon the list to participate in the organization of the senate or to cast any ballot for president of the senate, or who shall allow to be used in the organization of the senate any list of members not prepared and corrected as provided in this chapter, shall be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than three (3) years; and any clerk or other person who shall use this list in the organization of the senate, or who shall fraudulently alter, secrete, or destroy any list of members, prepared or prepared and corrected, as provided above, shall be punished by like imprisonment. Immediately upon the election of a president, the senate shall proceed to elect by ballot a secretary of the senate and reading clerk, and shall immediately notify the house of representatives that it is duly organized and ready to proceed with the business of the session. The secretary and clerk shall be employees of the legislative department under the jurisdiction and control of the senate, and shall hold office for two (2) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 25; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 27; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-2

; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 24; P.L. 1994, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 4, § 12; P.L. 2002, ch. 371, § 1.

22-3-2.1.
Powers of president.

Commencing in 2003, and after this, the powers currently held by the majority leader of the senate shall be transferred to the president of the senate. At that time, statutory references to the majority leader of the senate shall be amended and construed to mean a reference to the president of the senate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 158.

22-3-3.
Organization of house of representatives — Speaker — Clerks.

At the time specified in §

22-3-1

7, the house of representatives shall be called to order by the senior member in continuous service present from Newport, and if there are two (2) or more members from Newport of equal seniority of service then by that one of them that shall be senior in age, and if there is no member present from Newport, by the senior member of the house in continuous service present, and, if there are two (2) or more members of equal seniority of service, then by that one of them who is senior in age. The roll of members as appears by the list of representatives shall then be called by the reading clerk, as provided in §

22-3-2

. If it appears that thirty-eight (38) of the members whose names are upon the list are present, but not otherwise, the member calling the house of representatives to order as provided in this section shall call for nominations for the office of speaker, and shall receive the ballots of the members whose names are on the list for that office, and after the ballots have been counted by him or her and by the clerks of the house, he or she shall declare the result, and the balloting shall continue until some person receives a majority of all the ballots, and the person receiving that majority shall be the speaker of the house for the ensuing term of two (2) years. The member so calling the house to order shall not receive, entertain, or put to vote any motion or question whatever, or point of order, while acting as presiding officer, and any member violating any of the foregoing provisions of this section, or allowing any person whose name is not upon the list to participate in the organization of the house or to cast any ballot for speaker, or who shall allow to be used in the organization of the house any list of members not prepared and corrected as provided in this chapter, shall be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than three (3) years; and any clerk or other person who shall use this list in the organization of the house, or who shall fraudulently alter, secrete, or destroy any list of members, prepared or prepared and corrected, as provided in §

22-3-1

, shall be punished by like imprisonment. Immediately upon the election of a speaker, the house of representatives shall proceed to elect by ballot a clerk of the house and a recording clerk, and upon the election of a speaker and clerks as provided, the house of representatives shall be deemed to be organized and shall immediately notify the senate that it is duly organized and ready to proceed with the business of the session. The clerks shall hold office for two (2) years, and until their successors are elected and qualified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 26; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 28; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-3

; P.L. 2000, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 4, § 12.

22-3-4.
Filling of vacancies.

The respective houses may fill vacancies in these offices as they occur.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 27; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 29; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-4

.

22-3-5.
Grand committee for induction and election of officers.

Immediately after the organization of the senate and house of representatives and notice of it as provided in §§

22-3-2

and

22-3-3

, the senate shall join the house of representatives in grand committee, for the purpose of inducting the persons elected into their respective offices, and of electing general officers in case of a failure to elect by the electors at the general election.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 13; P.L. 1901, ch. 852, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 28; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 30; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-5

.

22-3-6.
Continuing effect of lists — Violations by secretary of state.

The list of members of the senate and of the house of representatives prepared and corrected as provided in this chapter shall continue to be the lists of members of the senate and of the house respectively, until altered by vote of the respective houses, and any secretary of state who shall willfully fail to prepare and correct the lists according to the provisions of this chapter, or to do any other thing in relation to the lists provided in this chapter to be done by him or her, or who shall fraudulently place upon any of the lists the name of any person not provided in this chapter to be placed on it, or who shall fraudulently neglect to place upon any of the lists the name of any person entitled to be placed on it, shall be imprisoned not less than one nor more than three (3) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 29; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 31; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-6

.

22-3-7.
Provisions mandatory.

The foregoing provisions of this title and the provisions of §§

22-3-13

—

22-3-17

are mandatory and not merely directory.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 30, as enacted by P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 32, as enacted by P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-7

.

22-3-8.
Form of engagement of legislators.

The following shall be the form of engagement to be taken by the senators and representatives: You being chosen to the place of (naming the office) in the general assembly, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that you will be true and faithful to this state of Rhode Island; that you will support the Constitution of the United States, and the Constitution and laws of this state, and that you will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of your office, to the best of your abilities, according to law; so help you God. (Or: this affirmation you make and give under peril of the penalty of perjury.)

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 33; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 35; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-8

.

22-3-9.
Engagement of legislators absent from organization meeting.

Senators and representatives not present at the first meeting of the respective houses shall, after presenting the evidence of their election, take the engagement of office before they shall act in their respective offices.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 32; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 34; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-9

.

22-3-10.
Election of president pro tempore of senate.

On the first Tuesday in January in each odd-numbered year, a president pro tempore of the senate shall be elected for a term of two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 35; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 37; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-10

.

22-3-11.
Election or appointment of committees.

In the month of January in each odd-numbered year, the senate shall elect its committees or provide by rule for their appointment, and the house of representatives shall elect its committees or provide by rule for their appointment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 36; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 38; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-11

.

22-3-12.
Legislative manual.

The secretary of state shall prepare in each odd-numbered year a legislative manual for the use of the general assembly, containing the rolls of membership, the committees, the rules and orders, and any other matter that the secretary may think proper. The number of manuals to be printed and bound will be determined by the secretary of state. Ten (10) copies shall be distributed to each of the senators and representatives of the general assembly; forty (40) copies shall be placed at the disposal of the governor; and the remainder shall be placed in the hands of the secretary of state. There shall be appropriated in each odd numbered year, an amount sufficient to cover the cost of printing and binding of the manual.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1057, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 11; P.L. 1920, ch. 1859, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 28, § 8; P.L. 1921, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 28, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 307, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-12

; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 67.

22-3-13.
Certification and delivery or retention of lists.

At or before twelve o’clock noon (12:00 p.m.) on the first Tuesday in January in each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state shall certify and deliver to the reading clerk of the house of representatives the list of persons, made up as provided in §

22-3-1

, entitled to seats in the house of representatives, and shall certify and retain in his or her possession the list of persons so made up entitled to seats in the senate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 5; P.L. 1901, ch. 808, § 14; P.L. 1902, ch. 1046, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 20; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 22; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-13

.

22-3-14.
Correction of lists on certificate presented after call to order.

In case any person whose name does not appear on the lists shall, upon the calling to order as provided in this chapter of the senate and house of representatives, respectively, and before organization, present to the secretary of state a certificate of that person’s election to the office of senator or representative, over the signatures of the board of elections, and there being no certificate of the election of any other person to that office returned to or received by the secretary of state as provided in this chapter, the secretary of state in the senate and the reading clerk in the house of representatives shall correct the lists, respectively, by placing on them the name of the person presenting the certificate as senator or representative as the case may be, from the senatorial district or representative district which it appears by the certificate he or she is entitled to represent, and by erasing from the list where it appears the name of the person previously placed on it as senator or representative by reason of no certificate of the election of any person to that office having been received by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 6; P.L. 1905, ch. 1229, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 21; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 23; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-14

; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 24.

22-3-15.
Substitution of incumbents for absentees on lists.

In case any person whose name appears upon either of the lists made by the secretary of state as senator or representative from any senatorial district or representative district, by virtue of any certificate of election returned to the office of or received by the secretary of state, shall not be present at the time of calling the roll of members as provided below in this chapter, the list bearing the name of that person shall be further corrected, by the secretary of state in the senate and by the reading clerk in the house of representatives, by substituting for the person’s name the name of the person then holding that office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 22; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 24; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-15

; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 24.

22-3-16.
Persons entitled to participate in organization of houses.

The persons whose names appear upon the lists made up and corrected as provided in this chapter, and no others, shall be entitled to participate in the organization of the senate and house of representatives, respectively.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 23; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 25; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-16

.

22-3-17.
Taking of engagement of office by members.

On the first Tuesday in January in each odd-numbered year, at twelve o’clock noon (12:00 p.m.), the persons whose names are borne on the respective lists shall be admitted to take seats as members of the senate and house of representatives, respectively, and those persons shall assemble at that time in their respective chambers at Providence and take their engagement of office before the secretary of state, attorney general, or some person authorized by law to administer oaths.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 19, § 9; P.L. 1901, ch. 808, § 15; P.L. 1902, ch. 1046, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 25, § 24; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 34; P.L. 1914, ch. 1051, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 24, § 26; P.L. 1930, ch. 1526, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 301, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

22-3-17

.

22-3-18.
Electronic voting.

For the purpose of receiving and recording the vote of members of the general assembly pursuant to the rules of the senate and the house of representatives, the joint committee on legislative services shall provide for the senate and house of representatives an electronic device or devices for the use by the members of the general assembly in casting and recording votes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 43.

22-3-19.
Sound system.

There shall be installed in the chambers of the general assembly for use by members a sound reinforcement system providing for pickup and amplification of one or more of one hundred and six (106) microphones under the control of the speaker of the house of representatives, with one of these microphones to be located on the desk of each representative, and amplification of one or more of fifty-four (54) microphones under the control of the president of the senate, with one of these microphones to be located on the desk of each senator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 43.

22-3-20.
Resolutions of congratulations and condolence during adjournment.

The speaker of the house of representatives or the president of the senate may approve a resolution of congratulations or condolence which resolution may be submitted during a period of adjournment of the general assembly. Each legislator shall be allowed no more than a total of twenty-five (25) of these resolutions annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 22.